Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.030

Judicial retirement account plan established.

The judicial retirement account plan is established for judges appointed or elected under chapter 2.04, 2.06, or 2.08 RCW and who are members of the public employees' retirement system for their service as a judge.

[ 1988 c 109 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.